Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "male" means a person with a heterogametic sex chromosome pair consisting of one X chromosome and one Y chromosome. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.04, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Exceptions. (a) Notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary, in athletic programs operated by educational institutions or public services and designed for participants 12 years old or older or in the 7th grade or above, it is not an unfair discriminatory practice to restrict membership on an athletic team to participants of one sex whose overall athletic opportunities have previously been limited.new text begin Consistent with this section, in no case may male students try out for or participate on a female-only team. A male student who participates on a female-only team is guilty of a petty misdemeanor.new text end (b) When an educational institution or a public service provides athletic teams for children 11 years old or younger or in the 6th grade or below, those teams shall be operated without restrictions on the basis of sex, except that when overall athletic opportunities for one sex have previously been limited and there is a demonstrated interest by members of that sex to participate on a team restricted to members of that sex, the educational institution or public service may provide a team restricted to members of that sex.new text begin Consistent with this section, in no case may students of the male sex try out for or participate on a female-only team. A male student who participates on a female-only team is guilty of a petty misdemeanor.new text end (c) When two teams in the same sport are in fact separated or substantially separated according to sex, the two teams shall be provided with substantially equal budgets per participant, exclusive of gate receipts and other revenues generated by that sport, and in all other respects shall be treated in a substantially equal manner. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to require the two teams to conduct combined practice sessions or any other combined activities related to athletics. (d) If two teams are provided in the same sport, one of these teams may be restricted to members of a sex whose overall athletic opportunities have previously been limited, and members of either sex shall be permitted to try out for the other team. (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a), (b), and (d), any wrestling team may be restricted to members of one sex whether or not the overall athletic opportunities of that sex have previously been limited, provided that programs or events are provided for each sex to the extent the educational institution or public service determines that these programs or events are necessary to accommodate the demonstrated interest of each sex to participate in wrestling. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.04, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Rules. The commissioner of education, after consultation with the commissioner of human rights must promulgate rules in accordance with chapter 14 to implement this section to prevent discrimination in elementary and secondary school athletic programs operated by educational institutions. The rules promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall not require athletic competition or tournaments for teams whose membership may be restricted to members of a sex whose overall athletic opportunities have previously been limited to be scheduled in conjunction with the scheduling of athletic competition or tournaments for teams whose membership is not so restricted by this section. Any organization, associationnew text begin ,new text end or leaguenew text begin , including the Minnesota State High School League,new text end entered into by elementary or secondary schools or public services for the purpose of promoting sports or adopting rules and regulations for the conduct of athletic contests between members shall provide rules and regulations and conduct its activities so as to permit its members to comply fully with this section. The rules of that organization, association or league may provide separate seasons for athletic competition or tournaments in a sport for teams whose membership may be restricted to members of a sex whose overall athletic opportunities have previously been limited from athletic competition or tournaments established for teams in that same sport whose membership is not so restricted by this section, and its rules may prohibit a participating student from competing on more than one school team in a given sport during a single school year. Sec. 4. new text begin [121A.213] DRESSING FACILITIES. new text end new text begin Public school communal restrooms, locker rooms, dressing rooms, shower rooms, and any other facility or setting where a student may be in a state of undress shall be designated female only or male only. A male who uses a female-only facility is guilty of a misdemeanor. For the purposes of this section, "male" means a person with a heterogametic sex chromosome pair consisting of one X chromosome and one Y chromosome. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [135A.151] SINGLE-SEX ATHLETICS AND DRESSING FACILITIES POLICY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "male" means a person with a heterogametic sex chromosome pair consisting of one X chromosome and one Y chromosome. new text end new text begin Subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin This section applies to the following postsecondary institutions: new text end new text begin (1) institutions governed by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities or the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (2) private postsecondary institutions that offer in-person courses on a campus located in Minnesota and which are eligible institutions as defined in section 136A.103. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Policy requirements. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary, in athletic programs operated by postsecondary institutions, it is not an unfair discriminatory practice to restrict membership on an athletic team to participants of one sex. In no case may male students try out for or participate on a female-only team. A male student who participates on a female-only team is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) Communal restrooms, locker rooms, dressing rooms, shower rooms, and any other facility or setting where a student may be in a state of undress shall be designated female only or male only. A male who uses a female-only facility is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end